hyphen-patterns/dehyphn.txt
ß1c
ß1d
ß1d
ß1f8
ß1f8
ß1g
ß1g
ß1h
ß1h
ß1k
ß1k
ß1l
ß1l
ß1m
ß1m
ß1n
ß1n
ß1o
ß1o
ß1p8
ß1p8
ß1r
ß1r
ß1s2
ß1s2
ß1ta
ß1ta
ß1te
ß1te
ß1ti
ß1ti
ß1tr
ß1tr
ß1v
ß1v
ß1w
ß1w
ß1z
ß1z
ß5ec
ß5ec
ß5q
ß5q
ß5to
ß5to
ß8as
ß8as
ßst8
ßst8
ßt3hei
ßt3hei
ä1a6
ä1che
ä1e
ä1he
ä1hi
ä1hu
ä1isc
ä1k
ä1le
ä1no
ä1pa
ä1re
ä1ri
ä1ro
ä1ru
ä1te
ä1ti
ä1to
ä1um.
ä1us.
ä1z
ä3chi
ä5chu
ä5fa
ä5ism
ä5j
ä5na
ä5rö
ä5tu
ä6d5ia
ä6g5nan
ä6ische
ä6s5chen
ä6thy
ä8lei
äb1l
äch8sc
äch8sp
äck5a
äd1a
äd5era
äf1l
äft6s
äg1h
äg3le
äg5str
äh1le
äh1re
äh1ru
äh1w
äh5ne
äh5ri
äl1c
äl6schl
äm8n
äm8s
ämi1e
än6s5c
äne5i8
äng3l
änk5l
äp6s5c
är1c
är6gl
äre8m
ärt6s5
äs1th
äsen8s
ät8schl
äta8b
äter5it
äteri4
äts1p
äu1e
äu5i
äu8ga
äub1l
ö1b
ö1che
ö1he
ö1hu
ö1is
ö1ke
ö1mu
ö1no
ö1re
ö1ri
ö1ru
ö1te
ö1ti
ö1tu
ö1v
ö1w
ö2z
ö5chi
ö5na
ö5o6t
ö5th
öch8s2tei
öch8str
öcht6
öh1l8
öh1re
öl6k5l
öl8pl
önig6s3
öp6s5c
öpf3l
ör8gli
ör8tr
öwe8
ü1che
ü1chi
ü1he
ü1hu
ü1le
ü1lu
ü1re
ü1ri
ü1ro
ü1ru
ü1te
ü1ti
ü1tu
ü1v
ü2d1o4
ü3k
ü3ta
ü5pi
ü6deu
ü6h5erk
ü8ch3l
ü8ck
ü8heh
ü8rei
ü8sta
ü8stes
üb1l
üb1r
üb6e2
üch6s5c
ück1a
ück5ers
üd1a2
üd5s6
üdi8t
üg1l
üge4l5a
üh1le
üh1re
üh1ru
üh1w
üh5a
ül4l5a
ül4ps
ül6s5c
ül8lo
ün6zw
ün8da
ün8fei
ün8za
ünk5l
ür8fl
ür8fr
ür8geng
ür8sta
üs2s3te
üse8n
üt8tr
üt8zei
